tr: Tüy uygulaması: Kostüm yapımı; Kendin yap karma teknik; Dans/amigo aksesuarları; Çiçek aranjmanları; Suni sinek bağlama; Hediye paketi; Ev dekorasyonu; Takı/aksesuar; Maske yapımı; Şapkacılık/şapka yapımı; Not defteri hazırlama/kağıt işleri; Düğün/etkinlik dekoru; Diğer
pl: Zastosowanie piór: Tworzenie kostiumów; Zrób to sam (DIY) / mixed media; Akcesoria taneczne / cheerleaderskie; Kompozycje kwiatowe; Wykonywanie sztucznych much; Pakowanie prezentów; Dekoracje wnętrz; Biżuteria / akcesoria; Tworzenie masek; Modniarstwo / kapelusznictwo; Scrapbooking / rękodzieło z papieru; Dekoracje ślubne / imprezowe; Inne
en: Feather application: Costume making; DIY mixed media; Dance/cheer accessories; Floral arrangements; Fly tying; Gift wrapping; Home decor; Jewelry/accessories; Mask making; Millinery/hat making; Scrapbooking/paper crafts; Wedding/event decor; Other
bg-BG: Приложение на перата: Изработване на костюми; Смесени техники (Направи си сам); Аксесоари за танци/мажоретки; Флорални аранжировки; Връзване на мухи; Опаковане на подаръци; Домашен декор; Бижута/аксесоари; Изработване на маски; Шапкарство/изработване на шапки; Скрапбукинг/хартиени занаяти; Сватбен/събитиен декор; Друго
sk-SK: Použitie peria: Výroba kostýmov; DIY zmiešané techniky; Doplnky na tanec/cheerleading; Kvetinové aranžmány; Viazanie mušiek; Balenie darčekov; Bytové dekorácie; Šperky/doplnky; Výroba masiek; Klobučníctvo/výroba klobúkov; Scrapbooking/papierové remeslá; Svadobná/spoločenská výzdoba; Iné
el: Φτερό εφαρμογής: Κατασκευή κοστουμιών; DIY μεικτών μέσων; Αξεσουάρ χορού/μαζορετών; Συνθέσεις λουλουδιών; Κατασκευή τεχνητών μυγών (fly tying); Περιτύλιγμα δώρων; Διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Κοσμήματα/αξεσουάρ; Κατασκευή μασκών; Κατασκευή καπέλων; Λεύκωμα (scrapbooking)/χειροτεχνίες με χαρτί; Διακόσμηση γάμου/εκδηλώσεων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 羽毛用途: 服裝製作; DIY 複合媒材; 舞蹈/啦啦隊配件; 花藝設計; 綁毛鉤; 禮品包裝; 家居裝飾; 珠寶/配件; 面具製作; 女帽/製帽; 剪貼簿/紙工藝; 婚禮/活動裝飾; 其他
pt-BR: Aplicação da pena: Confecção de fantasias; Bricolagem com técnica mista; Acessórios de dança/líder de torcida; Arranjos florais; Atado de moscas; Embrulho para presente; Decoração de casa; Joias/acessórios; Confecção de máscaras; Chapelaria/confecção de chapéus; Scrapbook/artesanato em papel; Decoração de casamentos/eventos; Outros
ja: 羽根の適用: コスチューム製作; DIYミクストメディア; ダンス/チアアクセサリー; フラワーアレンジメント; フライタイイング; ギフトラッピング; ホームデコ; ジュエリー/アクセサリー; マスク製作; 帽子製作; スクラップブッキング/ペーパークラフト; ウェディング/イベントデコレーション; その他
cs: Aplikace z peří: Tvorba kostýmů; DIY smíšená média; Doplňky pro tanec a roztleskávání; Květinová aranžmá; Vázání mušek; Balení dárků; Bytové dekorace; Šperky a doplňky; Výroba masek; Modiství / výroba klobouků; Scrapbooking / tvoření z papíru; Svatební / slavnostní dekorace; Jiné
zh-CN: 羽毛用途: 演出服制作; DIY 综合材料; 舞蹈/啦啦队配饰; 花艺布置; 绑制飞蝇假饵; 礼品包装; 家居装饰; 珠宝/配饰; 面具制作; 女帽/帽子制作; 剪贴簿/纸艺; 婚礼/活动装饰; 其他
it: Applicazione delle pium: Realizzazione di costumi; Tecniche miste fai da te; Accessori per danza/cheerleading; Composizioni floreali; Costruzione di mosche; Confezionamento regali; Decorazione d’interni; Gioielli/accessori; Realizzazione di maschere; Modisteria/creazione di cappelli; Scrapbooking/artigianato con la carta; Decorazioni per matrimoni ed eventi; Altro
sl-SI: Način uporabe perja: Izdelava kostumov; Naredi sam (mešani mediji); Plesni in navijaški dodatki; Cvetlični aranžmaji; Izdelava umetnih muh; Zavijanje daril; Dekoracija za dom; Nakit/dodatki; Izdelava mask; Klobučarstvo/izdelava klobukov; Ustvarjanje s papirjem/beležke; Dekoracija za poroke/dogodke; Drugo
vi: Ứng dụng của lông vũ: Làm trang phục hóa trang; Sáng tạo nghệ thuật đa chất liệu (DIY); Phụ kiện khiêu vũ/cổ vũ; Cắm hoa; Buộc ruồi câu cá; Gói quà; Trang trí nhà cửa; Trang sức/phụ kiện; Làm mặt nạ; Nghề làm mũ/làm mũ; Sổ lưu niệm/thủ công bằng giấy; Trang trí tiệc cưới/sự kiện; Khác
sv: Fjäderapplikation: Tillverkning av maskeradkläder; DIY blandteknik; Dans-/cheerleading-accessoarer; Blomsterarrangemang; Flugbindning; Paketinslagning; Heminredning; Smycken/accessoarer; Masktillverkning; Modisteri/hatttillverkning; Scrapbooking/papperspyssel; Dekoration för bröllop/evenemang; Övrigt
de: Verwendungszweck der Federn: Kostümherstellung; DIY-Mixed-Media; Tanz-/Cheerleader-Zubehör; Blumenarrangements; Fliegenbinden; Geschenkverpackung; Wohnkultur; Schmuck/Accessoires; Maskenherstellung; Hutmacherei; Scrapbooking/Papierbasteln; Hochzeits-/Event-Dekoration; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Aplikacija perja: Izrada kostima; Kombinirana tehnika / uradi sam (DIY); Dodaci za ples / navijanje; Cvjetni aranžmani; Vezivanje muha; Pakiranje poklona; Kućni dekor; Nakit/dodaci; Izrada maski; Modistički zanat / izrada šešira; Spomenari / rukotvorine od papira; Dekoracija za vjenčanja i događaje; Ostalo
hu: Toll alkalmazása: Jelmezkészítés; DIY vegyes technika; Tánc-/cheerleader-kiegészítők; Virágkötészet; Műlégy-kötés; Ajándékcsomagolás; Lakberendezés; Ékszer/kiegészítők; Maszkkészítés; Kalapkészítés; Scrapbooking/papírkézművesség; Esküvői/rendezvénydekoráció; Egyéb
nb: Feather-appen: Kostymeproduksjon; DIY blandede medier; Tilbehør for dans/cheerleading; Blomsteroppsatser; Fluebinding; Gaveinnpakning; Interiør; Smykker/tilbehør; Maskeproduksjon; Hatteproduksjon; Scrapbooking / papirhåndverk; Bryllups-/arrangementsdekor; Annet
ko: 깃털 용도: 코스튬 제작; DIY 혼합 미디어; 무용/치어리딩 액세서리; 꽃꽂이; 플라이 타잉; 선물 포장; 홈 데코; 주얼리/액세서리; 마스크 제작; 여성용 모자/모자 제작; 스크랩북/종이 공예; 결혼식/이벤트 장식; 기타
fi: Höyhenten käyttötapa: Pukujen valmistus; Sekatekniikka-askartelu; Tanssi-/cheerleading-tarvikkeet; Kukka-asetelmat; Perhonsidonta; Lahjapaketointi; Sisustus; Korut/asusteet; Naamioiden valmistus; Modistin työt / hattujen valmistus; Leikekirjailu/paperiaskartelu; Häiden/tapahtumien koristelu; Muu
lt-LT: Plunksnų paskirtis: Kostiumų gamyba; Mišrių technikų „Pasidaryk pats“; Šokių / palaikymo komandų aksesuarai; Gėlių kompozicijos; Musių rišimas; Dovanų pakavimas; Namų dekoras; Papuošalai / aksesuarai; Kaukių gamyba; Skrybėlių / kepurių gamyba; Iškarpų albumai / popieriaus rankdarbiai; Vestuvių / renginių dekoras; Kita
es: Aplicación de plumas: Confección de disfraces; Técnica mixta DIY; Accesorios de baile/animación; Arreglos florales; Atado de moscas; Envoltura de regalos; Decoración del hogar; Joyas/accesorios; Creación de máscaras; Sombrerería/confección de sombreros; Scrapbooking/manualidades con papel; Decoración para bodas/eventos; Otra
da: Anvendelse af fjer: Kostumefremstilling; Gør det selv-mixed media; Danse-/cheertilbehør; Blomsterdekorationer; Fluebinding; Gaveindpakning; Boligindretning; Smykker/tilbehør; Maskefremstilling; Hattefremstilling; Scrapbooking/papirkunst; Bryllups-/begivenhedsdekoration; Andet
ro-RO: Aplicație cu pene: Crearea de costume; Tehnici mixte de bricolaj (DIY); Accesorii pentru dans/majorete; Aranjamente florale; Legarea muștelor artificiale; Împachetarea cadourilor; Decorațiuni interioare; Bijuterii/accesorii; Confecționarea de măști; Modistă/confecționare de pălării; Scrapbooking/artizanat din hârtie; Decor pentru nunți/evenimente; Altele
nl: Veer toepassing: Kostuums maken; Doe-het-zelf mixed media; Dans-/cheerleaderaccessoires; Bloemstukken; Vliegbinden; Cadeauverpakking; Woondecoratie; Sieraden/accessoires; Maskers maken; Hoeden maken; Scrapbooking/papierknutselen; Bruilofts-/evenementendecoratie; Overig
pt-PT: Aplicação da pena: Confeção de disfarces; Meios mistos DIY; Acessórios de dança/cheerleading; Arranjos florais; Confeção de moscas artificiais; Embrulhos de presentes; Decoração para a casa; Joias/acessórios; Confeção de máscaras; Chapelaria/confeção de chapéus; Scrapbooking/artesanato em papel; Decoração de casamentos/eventos; Outro
ru: Назначение перьев: Создание костюмов; Смешанные техники (DIY); Аксессуары для танцев/чирлидинга; Флористические композиции; Вязание мушек; Упаковка подарков; Домашний декор; Украшения/аксессуары; Изготовление масок; Изготовление шляп/головных уборов; Скрапбукинг/бумажные поделки; Свадебный/праздничный декор; Другое
th: รูปแบบการนำขนนกไปใช้งาน: การทำชุดคอสตูม; DIY สื่อผสม; อุปกรณ์เต้น/เชียร์; การจัดดอกไม้; การผูกเหยื่อฟลาย; การห่อของขวัญ; ของตกแต่งบ้าน; เครื่องประดับ/อุปกรณ์เสริม; การทำหน้ากาก; การทำหมวกสตรี/การทำหมวก; สมุดภาพ/งานประดิษฐ์จากกระดาษ; ของตกแต่งงานแต่งงาน/งานอีเวนต์; อื่นๆ
fr: Usage prévu des plumes: Création de costumes; Bricolage technique mixte; Accessoires de danse/cheerleading; Arrangements floraux; Montage de mouches; Emballage de cadeaux; Décoration intérieure; Bijoux/accessoires; Création de masques; Chapellerie/fabrication de chapeaux; Scrapbooking/artisanat en papier; Décoration de mariage/d’événement; Autre